Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-3412
Emeritus, defined.

Emeritus means an architect or professional engineer who has relinquished his or her license and who is approved by the board to use the honorary title emeritus.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 12;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 11.